Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. ORS 458.580, 458.581, 458.582 and 458.584 are repealed.
SECTION 2. As used in ORS 419B.112 and sections 2 to 5 of this 2017 Act:
(1) “CASA Volunteer Program” means a program that is  approved or sanctioned by a
juvenile court, has  received accreditation from the National CASA Association and has en-
tered into a contract with  the Oregon Department of Administrative Services under section
3 of this 2017  Act to recruit, train and supervise volunteers to serve as court appointed
special advocates.
(2) “Court appointed special advocate” means a person in a  CASA Volunteer Program
who is appointed by the court to act as a court appointed special advocate  pursuant to ORS
419B.112.
SECTION 3. (1) The Oregon Department of Administrative Services shall:
(a) Contract  with all CASA Volunteer Programs in this state to recruit, train and su-
pervise court appointed special advocates. The department may delegate authority to con-
tract under this paragraph to the statewide coordinating  entity contracted with under
paragraph (b) of this subsection.
(b) Contract with a nongovernmental entity to serve as the statewide coordinating entity
for the  provision of court appointed special advocate services throughout this state. The
nongovernmental entity must be a member of the National  CASA Association and have a
board or other membership structure that contains directors  from the CASA Volunteer
Programs in this state. At a  minimum, the contract must include authority for the state-
wide coordinating entity to:
(A) Contract with CASA Volunteer Programs;
(B) Disburse  and expend moneys in the Court Appointed Special Advocate Fund estab-
lished in section 5 of this 2017 Act to CASA Volunteer Programs in this state; and
(C) Execute the standards described in paragraph (c) of this subsection.
(c) Oversee and monitor CASA Volunteer Program standards,  with assistance from the
statewide coordinating entity contracted with by the  department under paragraph (b) of this
subsection, to recruit, train and supervise court appointed special advocates.
Enrolled House Bill 2600 (HB 2600-A) Page 1
(d) Disburse and expend moneys in the Court  Appointed Special Advocate Fund estab-
lished under section 5 of this 2017 Act for the purposes set forth in this  section and ORS
419B.112. The department may disburse and expend  moneys from the fund to the statewide
coordinating entity contracted with pursuant to paragraph  (b) of this subsection for the
purposes set forth in this section and ORS 419B.112.
(e) With the assistance of the statewide coordinating entity contracted with pursuant  to
paragraph (b) of this subsection, oversee the provision  of court appointed special advocate
services throughout this state in a uniform, consistent and cost-efficient manner by ensuring
that CASA Volunteer Programs:
(A) Adopt policies, procedures, standards and guidelines regarding the provision  of court
appointed special advocate services as directed by the department; and
(B) Develop and provide training and education for court appointed special advocates and
employees and other volunteers in CASA Volunteer  Programs as directed by the department.
(f) Identify statewide outcome or performance measures for CASA Volunteer Programs.
(g) Collect, evaluate and  summarize data regarding CASA Volunteer Programs and court
appointed special advocate services in this state.
(h) Adopt rules for carrying out the department’s  responsibilities, duties and functions
under this section and ORS 419B.112.
(2) The department may:
(a) Delegate to a statewide coordinating entity contracted with under subsection  (1)(b)
of this section the responsibility to:
(A) Create, supervise and operate CASA Volunteer Programs throughout this state; and
(B) Develop and provide training for court appointed special advocates and employees and
volunteers of CASA Volunteer Programs.
(b) Consult with public agencies or private nonprofit  organizations for the purpose of
developing:
(A) An allocation formula for the disbursement of moneys to CASA Volunteer  Programs
in this state; and
(B) Policies, procedures, standards and guidelines regarding the  provision of court ap-
pointed special advocate services in this state.
(c) Apply for and receive funds from state, federal and private  sources for CASA Volun-
teer Programs and the provision of court appointed special advocate services in this state.
(3) The statewide coordinating entity with which the department  has contracted under
subsection (1)(b)  of this section, or to which the department has delegated responsibilities
under subsection (2)(a) of this section, shall provide biannual reports to the  department re-
garding:
(a) The fulfillment of responsibilities that have been contracted for or delegated; and
(b) When applicable to responsibilities contracted for or delegated,  the achievement of
the objectives in subsection (1)(d) to (g) of this section.
(4) The department  shall report annually to committees of the Legislative Assembly re-
lated to the provision of court appointed special advocate services regarding the  disburse-
ment of moneys in the Court Appointed Special Advocate Fund established  under section 5
of this 2017 Act. The report  must summarize the extent to which the statewide outcome or
performance measures identified by the department under  section 3 of this 2017 Act are be-
ing met and include an analysis of the effectiveness of court appointed special advocate  ser-
vices provided in this state.
SECTION 4.
Each CASA Volunteer Program shall report biannually to committees of the
Legislative Assembly related to the provision of court appointed special advocate  services.
The statewide coordinating entity contracted with  by the Oregon Department of Adminis-
trative Services under section 3 of this 2017 Act may present the biannual reports required
under this section  on behalf of the CASA Volunteer Programs in this state. The report must
Enrolled House Bill 2600 (HB 2600-A) Page 2
include each program’s status with respect to the  statewide outcome or performance meas-
ures identified by the department under section 3 of this 2017 Act.
SECTION 5. (1) The Court Appointed  Special Advocate Fund is established within the
State Treasury, separate and distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned by the  Court
Appointed Special Advocate Fund shall be credited to the fund.
(2) Moneys in the fund shall consist of:
(a) Amounts  appropriated or otherwise transferred to the fund by the Legislative As-
sembly;
(b) Amounts received from state, federal and private sources;
(c) Amounts donated to the fund; and
(d) Other amounts deposited in the fund from any source.
(3) Moneys in the fund are continuously appropriated to  the Oregon Department of Ad-
ministrative Services for the  purpose of carrying out the provisions of ORS 419B.112 and
section 3 of this 2017 Act.
(4) The department may use moneys in the  fund to pay the department’s administrative
costs associated with  the fund and with carrying out the provisions of ORS 419B.112 and
section 3 of this 2017 Act.
SECTION 5a.
The Oregon Department of Administrative Services shall submit the first
report required under section 3 of this 2017 Act no later than September 1, 2018.
CONFORMING AMENDMENTS
SECTION 6.  ORS 131A.360 is amended to read:
131A.360. (1) The provisions of this section apply only to a forfeiting  agency other than the
state, and apply only to forfeiture proceeds arising out of  prohibited conduct as defined by ORS
131A.005 (12)(a).
(2) If  the forfeiting agency is not a county, the forfeiting agency shall enter into an agreement,
under ORS chapter 190, with the county in which the  property was seized to provide a portion of
the forfeiture proceeds to the county.
(3) After entry of a judgment of forfeiture, a  forfeiting agency shall first pay from the forfeiture
proceeds the costs  incurred by seizing and forfeiting agencies in investigating and prosecuting the
case, including costs, disbursements and attorney fees as defined in ORCP  68 A, special expenses
such as the provision of currency for undercover law enforcement  operations, the cost of disabling
a hidden compartment in a motor vehicle and the expenses of maintaining  the seized property. The
forfeiting agency may not  pay expenditures made in connection with the ordinary maintenance and
operation of a seizing or forfeiting agency under this subsection.
(4) After payment of costs under subsection (3) of this section, the forfeiting agency shall:
(a) Deduct an amount equal to five percent of the forfeiture proceeds and deposit that amount
in the Illegal Drug Cleanup Fund established by ORS 475.495 for the purposes specified in  ORS
475.495 (5) and (6);
(b) Deduct an  amount equal to 2.5 percent of the forfeiture proceeds and deposit that amount
in the Asset Forfeiture Oversight Account;
(c) Deduct an amount equal to 20 percent of the forfeiture proceeds and  deposit that amount in
the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission Account established under  ORS 137.662 for disbursement
to drug court programs as described in ORS 3.450; and
(d) Deduct an amount equal to 10 percent of the forfeiture proceeds  and deposit that amount in
the Early Learning Division Fund established in ORS  326.435 for disbursement to relief nurseries
as described in ORS 417.788.
(5) If the forfeiting agency  has entered into an agreement with a county under subsection (2)
of this section, after paying  costs under subsection (3) of this section and making the deductions
required by subsection (4) of this section,  the forfeiting agency shall pay the county the amounts
required by the agreement.
Enrolled House Bill 2600 (HB 2600-A) Page 3
(6) After making all payments  and deductions required by subsections (3), (4) and (5) of this
section, the forfeiting agency may use the remaining forfeiture  proceeds, including amounts received
by a county under subsection (5) of this section or  by any other public body under an intergovern-
mental agreement entered into under ORS 131A.355, only for:
(a) The purchase of equipment necessary for the enforcement of laws relating to  the unlawful
delivery, distribution, manufacture or possession of controlled substances;
(b) Currency for undercover law enforcement operations;
(c) Drug awareness and drug education programs offered in middle schools and high schools;
(d) The expenses of a forfeiting agency in operating joint narcotic operations with other  for-
feiting agencies pursuant to  the terms of an intergovernmental agreement, including paying for
rental space, utilities and office equipment;
(e) Expenses of  a district attorney in criminal prosecutions for unlawful delivery, distribution,
manufacture or possession of controlled substances, as determined  through intergovernmental
agreement between the forfeiting agency and the district attorney;
(f) Drug treatment and programs that support drug treatment; and
(g) A CASA Volunteer Program as defined in [ ORS 458.580] section 2 of this 2017 Act .
(7) Notwithstanding subsection (6) of this section, growing equipment and laboratory equipment
seized by a forfeiting agency that was used, or intended for use, in the manufacturing of  controlled
substances may be donated to  a public school, community college or institution of higher education.
(8) A forfeiting agency shall sell as much property  as may be needed to make the distributions
required by this section. Distributions required under subsection (4) of this  section must be made
once every three months and  are due within 20 days of the end of each quarter. No interest shall
accrue on amounts that are paid within the period specified by this subsection.
SECTION 7.
 ORS 419A.255, as amended by section 11, chapter 417, Oregon Laws  2013, section
8, chapter 439, Oregon  Laws 2013, section 3, chapter 71, Oregon Laws 2014, section 2, chapter 293,
Oregon Laws 2015, and section 7, chapter 95, Oregon Laws 2016, is amended to read:
419A.255. (1)(a) The clerk of the court shall maintain a record of each case and a supplemental
confidential file for each case, except as otherwise provided in ORS 7.120.
(b) The record of the case shall be withheld from public inspection but is open  to inspection by
the following:
(A) The judge of the juvenile court and those acting under the judge’s direction;
(B) The child;
(C) The ward;
(D) The youth;
(E) The youth offender;
(F) The parent or guardian of the child, ward, youth or youth offender;
(G) The guardian ad litem for the parent;
(H) A person allowed to intervene in a proceeding involving the child, ward, youth or youth
offender;
(I) The court appointed  special advocate, and a representative of a CASA Volunteer Program
as defined in [ ORS 458.580 ] section 2 of this 2017 Act , when reasonably necessary for  the ap-
pointment or supervision of court appointed special advocates;
(J) The attorneys or prospective appellate attorneys for any of  the persons listed in subpara-
graphs (B) to (I) of this paragraph;
(K) The surrogate;
(L) Service providers in the case;
(M) The district attorney or assistant attorney general representing a party in the case;
(N) The juvenile department;
(O) The Department of Human Services;
(P) The Oregon Youth Authority; and
(Q) Any other person or entity  allowed by the court pursuant to section 9, chapter 95, Oregon
Laws 2016.
Enrolled House Bill 2600 (HB 2600-A) Page 4
(c) The following are entitled to copies of the record of the case:
(A) The judge of the juvenile court and those acting under the judge’s direction;
(B) A party to the extent permitted under ORS 419B.875 (2) or 419C.285 (2);
(C) A guardian ad litem for a parent  to the same extent the parent is permitted to copies under
ORS 419B.875 (2) or 419C.285 (2);
(D) Persons listed in paragraph (b)(J) to (P) of this subsection; and
(E) Any other person or entity allowed by the court pursuant to section 9,  chapter 95, Oregon
Laws 2016.
(2)(a) Reports and other material relating to the child, ward, youth or  youth offender’s history
and prognosis  in the record of the case or the supplemental confidential file are privileged and, ex-
cept at the request of the child,  ward, youth or youth offender, shall be withheld from public in-
spection except that inspection is permitted as set  forth in subsection (1)(b) of this section and
paragraph (b) of this subsection. The offer or admission of reports and other material in the  record
of the case or the supplemental  confidential file as exhibits in a hearing or trial does not waive or
otherwise change the privileged status of the reports and other  material, except for purposes of the
hearing or trial in which the reports and other material are offered or  admitted. Once offered as
an exhibit, reports  and other material relating to the child, ward, youth or youth offender’s history
and prognosis that were maintained in the supplemental confidential file become part  of the record
of the case but are subject to paragraph (e) of this subsection.
(b) A supplemental confidential file is open to inspection by the following:
(A) The judge of the juvenile court and those acting under the judge’s direction;
(B) The parent or guardian of the child or ward in a dependency case;
(C) The guardian ad litem for the parent of a child or ward in a dependency case;
(D) The parent or guardian of the youth or youth offender in a delinquency case  if the youth
or youth offender consents to, or the court authorizes, inspection;
(E) The guardian ad litem  for the parent of a youth or youth offender in a delinquency case if
the youth or youth offender consents to, or the court authorizes, inspection;
(F) A person allowed to intervene  in a proceeding involving the child, ward, youth or youth
offender;
(G) The court appointed special advocate, and a representative of  a CASA Volunteer Program
as defined in  [ ORS 458.580 ] section 2 of this 2017 Act , when reasonably necessary for the ap-
pointment or supervision of court appointed special advocates;
(H) The surrogate;
(I) Service providers in the case;
(J) The attorneys or prospective appellate attorneys for:
(i) The child;
(ii) The ward;
(iii) The youth;
(iv) The youth offender;
(v) The parent or guardian of the child, ward, youth or youth offender;
(vi) The guardian ad litem for the parent;
(vii) A person allowed  to intervene in a proceeding involving the child or ward in a dependency
case; or
(viii) The court appointed special advocate and a representative of a CASA  Volunteer Program
as defined in [ ORS 458.580] section 2 of this 2017 Act ;
(K) The district attorney or assistant attorney general representing a party in the case;
(L) The juvenile department;
(M) The Department of Human Services;
(N) The Oregon Youth Authority; and
(O) Any other person or entity allowed by the court pursuant to  section 9, chapter 95, Oregon
Laws 2016.
Enrolled House Bill 2600 (HB 2600-A) Page 5
(c) The supplemental confidential file in  cases under ORS 419C.005 may be disclosed to the su-
perintendent of the  school district in which the youth offender resides or the superintendent’s
designee.
(d) The following are entitled to  copies of material maintained in the supplemental confidential
file:
(A) The judge of the juvenile court and those acting under the judge’s direction;
(B) Service providers in the case;
(C) School superintendents and their designees in cases under ORS 419C.005;
(D) Attorneys designated under subsection (2)(b)(J) of this section;
(E) The district attorney or assistant attorney general representing a party in the case;
(F) The juvenile department;
(G) The Department of Human Services;
(H) The Oregon Youth Authority;
(I) The court appointed special advocate, and a representative of a  CASA Volunteer Program
as defined in  [ ORS 458.580 ] section 2 of this 2017 Act , when reasonably necessary for the ap-
pointment or supervision of court appointed special advocates; and
(J) Any other person or entity allowed by the court pursuant to section 9, chapter  95, Oregon
Laws 2016.
(e) A person that obtains copies of material in the supplemental confidential file pursuant  to
paragraph (d) of this subsection is responsible for preserving  the confidentiality of the material in
the supplemental confidential file. A  service provider, school superintendent or superintendent’s
designee who obtains copies of such material shall destroy the copies upon the conclusion  of in-
volvement in the case.
(3) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (5) of  this section, no information appearing in
the record of the case or in the supplemental confidential file may  be disclosed to any person not
described in subsections (1)(b) and (2)(b) of this section, respectively, without  the consent of the
court, except for purposes of evaluating  the child, ward, youth or youth offender’s eligibility for
special education as provided in ORS chapter 343, and no such information may be used in evidence
in any proceeding to establish criminal or civil liability against the child, ward,  youth or youth
offender, whether such proceeding occurs after the child, ward, youth or youth offender  has reached
18 years of age or otherwise, except for the following purposes:
(a) In connection with a presentence investigation after guilt has been admitted or established
in a criminal court.
(b) In connection with a proceeding in another juvenile  court concerning the child, ward, youth
or youth offender or an appeal from the juvenile court.
(4)(a) When a person described in subsection (1)(b)(M), (N), (O) or (P)  of this section inspects or
obtains copies of reports, materials or documents under this  subsection or under subsection (1) or
(2) of this section, the person may not use or disclose the reports, materials or documents, except:
(A) As provided in this subsection or under subsection (1) or (2) of this section;
(B) In the juvenile court proceeding for which the reports, materials or documents were  sought
or disclosed;
(C) With the consent of the court; or
(D) As provided in ORS 419A.253.
(b) Nothing in this section prohibits the district  attorney or assistant attorney general repres-
enting a  party in a juvenile court proceeding, the juvenile department, the Department of Human
Services,  the  Oregon Youth Authority or other parties in the proceeding or their attorneys from
disclosing  to  each other reports, materials or documents described in subsections (1) and (2) of this
section if the disclosure is reasonably  necessary to perform official duties related to the involvement
of the child, ward, youth or youth offender with the juvenile court or  the juvenile department. A
person to whom reports, materials or documents  are disclosed under this subsection is subject to
subsection (3) of this section.
Enrolled House Bill 2600 (HB 2600-A) Page 6
(5)(a) Information contained in the supplemental confidential file that, in the professional  judg-
ment of the juvenile counselor, caseworker, school superintendent or superintendent’s  designee,
teacher or detention worker to whom the information in  the supplemental confidential file has been
provided, indicates a clear and immediate danger to another person or to society shall be disclosed
to the appropriate authority and the person who is in danger  from the child, ward, youth or youth
offender.
(b) A person  that discloses information under paragraph (a) of this subsection has immunity from
any liability, civil or criminal, that might otherwise be incurred or  imposed for making the disclo-
sure.
(c) Nothing in this subsection affects the provisions of ORS 146.750, 146.760, 419B.035,  419B.040
and 419B.045. The disclosure of information under this subsection does not make the  information
admissible in any court or administrative proceeding if it is not otherwise admissible.
(6) Notwithstanding any other  provision of law, and subject to subsection (8) of this section, the
following are not confidential and not exempt from disclosure:
(a) The name and date of birth of the youth or youth offender;
(b) The basis for the juvenile court’s jurisdiction over the youth or youth offender;
(c) The date, time and place  of any juvenile court proceeding in which the youth or youth
offender is involved;
(d) The act  alleged in the petition that if committed by an adult would constitute a crime if ju-
risdiction is based on ORS 419C.005;
(e) That portion of the juvenile court order providing for  the legal disposition of the youth or
youth offender when jurisdiction is based on ORS 419C.005;
(f) The names and addresses of the youth or youth offender’s parents or guardians; and
(g) The register described in ORS 7.020 when jurisdiction is based on ORS 419C.005.
(7) Notwithstanding any other provision of  law, and subject to subsection (8) of this section,
when a  youth has been taken into custody under ORS 419C.080, the following information shall be
disclosed unless, and only for so long as, there is a clear  need to delay disclosure in the course of
a specific investigation, including the need to protect the complaining party or the victim:
(a) The youth’s name and age and whether the youth is employed or in school;
(b) The youth offense for which the youth was taken into custody;
(c) The name and age of the adult  complaining party and the adult victim, unless the disclosure
of such information is otherwise prohibited or restricted;
(d) The identity of the investigating and arresting agency; and
(e) The time and place that the youth was taken into custody and whether there  was resistance,
pursuit or a weapon used in taking the youth into custody.
(8) Except as provided in ORS 419A.300 and  unless otherwise directed by the court, only the
juvenile court, the county juvenile department and the  Oregon Youth Authority may disclose the
information under subsections (6) and (7) of this section if the information is subject to disclosure.
The youth  authority may disclose only information relating to youth offenders committed to the
youth authority by order of the juvenile court if the information is subject to disclosure under  sub-
section (6) or (7) of this section.
(9) Nothing in  this section limits access to any juvenile court records by an appellate court re-
viewing a juvenile court order or  judgment. Appellate court rules may establish procedures for ap-
pellate court access to juvenile records.
(10) Nothing in this section prohibits the court  from providing to the administrator as defined
in ORS 25.010 the date of entry of a judgment terminating parental rights or the date of entry of  a
judgment terminating wardship following  entry of a judgment of adoption together with the names
and dates of birth of the parents and children subject to the judgment.
(11) In addition to  any other provision in this section, the Judicial Department may permit
county or statewide  access to juvenile court records or information by county juvenile departments,
the Department of  Human Services, the Oregon Youth Authority, district attorney offices, the office
Enrolled House Bill 2600 (HB 2600-A) Page 7
of the Attorney General, the office of public  defense services, prospective appellate attorneys or
public defense providers subject to the following restrictions:
(a) A prospective appellate attorney or public defense provider granted  access under this sub-
section must agree, pursuant to a written agreement with the Judicial Department, to access:
(A) Party information only for purposes of conflicts screening procedures; and
(B) Other records  or information about a client only as reasonably necessary for the represen-
tation of that client in any juvenile case in which the client is a party, subject  to applicable state
and federal confidentiality laws.
(b) Any other person or entity granted access under this subsection must agree, pursuant to a
written agreement with the department, to  access records or information only as authorized and
allowed by this section, subject to applicable state and federal confidentiality laws.
(c) The State Court Administrator  shall prescribe standards and procedures to implement the
provisions of this subsection.
(d) Any person or entity  granted access to juvenile court records or information under this
subsection must preserve the confidentiality of that information as required under this section.
(12) A petition filed under ORS 419B.851 alleging that a  child who is a foreign national is within
the jurisdiction of the court, or a motion requesting an implementation plan other  than return of a
ward to the ward’s parent, is  subject to disclosure to the consulate for the child or ward’s country
as provided under ORS 419B.851 (3).
(13) Nothing in this section prohibits a guardian appointed under ORS 419B.365 or 419B.366 from
disclosing or providing copies of letters of guardianship when so required  to fulfill the duties of a
guardian.
(14) The court shall cooperate in the sharing of information  with a court in another state to
facilitate an interstate placement of a child or ward.
(15) Nothing in this section prohibits the Chief Justice of  the Supreme Court, the Chief Judge
of the Court of Appeals or a presiding judge from permitting access to juvenile court records,  in-
cluding the record of the case and the supplemental confidential  file in a juvenile court proceeding,
or audio or video recordings of a juvenile  court proceeding, by researchers or evaluators for the
purposes of developing statistics and performing analyses or  audits on the effectiveness, cost and
other areas of public interest regarding juvenile court  programs and activities in accordance with
child welfare and juvenile justice state plans and  programs related to Title IV-B and IV-E of the
Social Security Act and to the Child Abuse Prevention and Treatment Act (42 U.S.C. 5101 et seq).
The Chief Justice shall, by rule or order, establish standards and guidelines for the release of ju-
venile court information for research and evaluation purposes to  ensure confidentiality consistent
with state and federal law and  to promote consistent statewide application of this subsection. Sta-
tistics and analyses released by researchers and evaluators under this  subsection may not contain
any information that identifies any individual person involved in a juvenile court proceeding.
(16) Subject to subsection (11) of this  section, the office of public defense services shall be per-
mitted access to juvenile court records for the purposes of performing the office’s  duties as set forth
in ORS 151.219 to audit or investigate attorney appointment or representation of a party  in a juve-
nile court proceeding in order to  ensure adequate representation of parties in juvenile court pro-
ceedings  consistent  with the child welfare state plan related to Title IV-E of the Social Security
Act.
(17) Subject to subsection (11) of this section, the Oregon State Bar  shall be permitted access
to juvenile  court records maintained in the record of the case for the purpose of performing the
bar’s duties as set forth  in ORS 9.005 to 9.757 to investigate attorney representation of a party in
a juvenile court proceeding and in order  to ensure adequate representation of parties in juvenile
court proceedings consistent with the child welfare state plan related to  Title IV-E of the Social
Security Act.
(18)(a) A child, ward, youth or youth offender,  or the parent or guardian of a child, ward, youth
or youth offender who is a party to the juvenile court proceeding, who is entitled to inspect  or copy
the record of the case under  subsection (1)(b) and (c) of this section maintains the right to inspect
Enrolled House Bill 2600 (HB 2600-A) Page 8
or copy the record of  the case after jurisdiction of the court over the child, ward, youth or youth
offender terminates and after the child, ward, youth or  youth offender has reached the age of ma-
jority.
(b) Notwithstanding ORS 419B.524,  a parent of a child, ward, youth or youth offender whose
parental rights have been terminated maintains the right that existed under subsection (1)(b)  and (c)
of this section to  inspect or copy the record of the case as the record of the case existed up until
the time of entry of the judgment terminating the parent’s parental rights and may  obtain a copy
of the judgment terminating the parent’s parental rights.
(19) When inspection or copying  of the record of the case or of the supplemental confidential file
is allowed pursuant to this section, and unless otherwise required  by law, the court that maintains
the record of the case or the supplemental confidential file is not required to  redact the names of,
or information about, siblings or other persons contained in the record of the case or the  supple-
mental confidential file.
SECTION 8.  ORS 419A.004, as amended by section 46, chapter 106, Oregon  Laws 2016, is
amended to read:
419A.004. As used in this chapter  and ORS chapters 419B and 419C, unless the context requires
otherwise:
(1) “Age-appropriate or developmentally appropriate activities” means:
(a) Activities or items  that are generally accepted as suitable for children of the same chrono-
logical age or level of  maturity or that are determined to be developmentally appropriate for a child,
based on  the development of cognitive, emotional, physical and behavioral capacities that are typical
for an age or age group; and
(b) In the case of a specific child, activities or items that are suitable for the child based on the
developmental stages attained by the child with respect to the cognitive,  emotional, physical and
behavioral capacities of the child.
(2) “Another planned permanent living arrangement” means an out-of-home placement for a ward
16 years of age or older that is consistent with the case plan and in  the best interests of the ward
other than placement:
(a) By adoption;
(b) With a legal guardian; or
(c) With a fit and willing relative.
(3) “CASA Volunteer Program”  means a program that is approved or sanctioned by a juvenile
court, has received accreditation  from the National CASA Association and has entered into a con-
tract  with  the Oregon [ Volunteers Commission for Voluntary Action and Service under ORS
458.581] Department of Administrative Services under section 3 of  this 2017 Act  to recruit,
train and supervise volunteers to serve as court appointed special advocates.
(4) “Child care center” means a residential facility for wards or youth  offenders that is licensed,
certified or otherwise authorized as a child-caring agency as that term is defined in ORS 418.205.
(5) “Community service” has the meaning given that term in ORS 137.126.
(6) “Conflict of interest” means a person appointed to a local citizen review board  who has a
personal or pecuniary interest in a case being reviewed by that board.
(7) “Counselor” means a juvenile department counselor or a county juvenile probation officer.
(8) “Court” means the juvenile court.
(9) “Court appointed special advocate” means a person in a CASA Volunteer Program who is
appointed by the court to act as a court appointed special advocate pursuant to ORS 419B.112.
(10) “Court facility” has the meaning given that term in ORS 166.360.
(11) “Current caretaker” means a foster parent who:
(a) Is currently caring for a ward who is in the legal custody of the Department  of Human
Services and who has a permanency plan or concurrent permanent plan of adoption; and
(b) Who has cared for  the ward, or at least one sibling of the ward, for at least the immediately
prior 12 consecutive months or for one-half of the ward’s or sibling’s life where the ward or  sibling
is younger than two years of age.
Enrolled House Bill 2600 (HB 2600-A) Page 9
(12) “Department” means the Department of Human Services.
(13) “Detention”  or “detention facility” means a facility established under ORS 419A.010 to
419A.020 and 419A.050 to 419A.063 for the detention of  children, wards, youths or youth offenders
pursuant to a judicial commitment or order.
(14) “Director” means the  director of a juvenile department established under ORS 419A.010 to
419A.020 and 419A.050 to 419A.063.
(15) “Guardian” means guardian of the person and not guardian of the estate.
(16) “Indian child” means any unmarried person less than 18 years of age who is:
(a) A member of an Indian tribe; or
(b) Eligible for membership in an Indian tribe and is the  biological child of a member of an In-
dian tribe.
(17) “Juvenile court” means the court having jurisdiction of juvenile  matters in the several
counties of this state.
(18) “Local citizen review board” means the board specified by ORS 419A.090 and 419A.092.
(19) “Parent” means the biological or adoptive mother  and the legal father of the child, ward,
youth or youth offender. As used in this subsection, “legal father” means:
(a) A man who  has adopted the child, ward, youth or youth offender or whose paternity has been
established or declared under ORS 109.070 or 416.400 to 416.465 or by a juvenile court; and
(b) In cases in which the Indian Child Welfare Act applies, a man  who is a father under appli-
cable tribal law.
(20) “Permanent foster care” means an out-of-home placement  in which there is a long-term
contractual foster care agreement between the foster parents and the department that is approved
by the juvenile court and in which the  foster parents commit to raise a ward in substitute care or
youth offender until the age of majority.
(21) “Public building” has the meaning given that term in ORS 166.360.
(22) “Reasonable  and prudent parent standard” means the standard, characterized by careful and
sensible parental decisions that maintain the health, safety and best interests of a child or  ward
while encouraging the emotional and developmental growth of the child or ward,  that a substitute
care provider shall use when determining whether to allow a  child or ward in substitute care to
participate in extracurricular, enrichment, cultural and social activities.
(23) “Reasonable time” means a period of time that is reasonable given a child or ward’s emo-
tional and developmental needs and ability to form and maintain lasting attachments.
(24) “Records” means any information in written form, pictures, photographs, charts,  graphs,
recordings or documents pertaining to a case.
(25) “Resides” or “residence,” when used in reference to the  residence of a child, ward, youth
or youth offender, means the place where the  child, ward, youth or youth offender is actually living
or the jurisdiction in which wardship or jurisdiction has been established.
(26) “Restitution” has the meaning given that term in ORS 137.103.
(27) “Serious physical injury” means:
(a) A serious physical injury as defined in ORS 161.015; or
(b) A physical injury that:
(A) Has a permanent or protracted significant effect on a child’s daily activities;
(B) Results in substantial and recurring pain; or
(C) In the case of a child under 10 years of age, is a broken bone.
(28) “Shelter care” means a home or other facility suitable for  the safekeeping of a child, ward,
youth or youth offender who is taken into temporary custody pending investigation and  disposition.
(29) “Short-term detention facility” means a  facility established under ORS 419A.050 (3) for
holding children, youths and youth offenders pending further placement.
(30) “Sibling” means one of two or more children or wards related:
(a) By blood or adoption through a common legal parent; or
(b) Through the marriage of the children’s or wards’ legal or biological parents.
Enrolled House Bill 2600 (HB 2600-A) Page 10
(31) “Substitute care” means an out-of-home placement directly supervised by  the department
or other agency, including placement in a foster family home, group home, child-caring agency as
defined in ORS 418.205 or other child caring institution or facility. “Substitute care” does  not in-
clude care in:
(a) A detention facility, forestry camp or youth correction facility;
(b) A family home that the court has approved as a ward’s permanent placement, when a child-
caring agency as defined in ORS 418.205 has been appointed guardian of  the ward and when the
ward’s care is entirely privately financed; or
(c) In-home placement subject to conditions or limitations.
(32) “Surrogate” means a person appointed by the court to protect the right of the child,  ward,
youth or youth offender to receive procedural safeguards with respect  to the provision of free ap-
propriate public education.
(33) “Tribal court” means a court with jurisdiction over  child custody proceedings and that is
either a Court of Indian  Offenses, a court established and operated under the code of custom of an
Indian tribe or any other administrative body of a tribe that is vested with  authority over child
custody proceedings.
(34) “Victim” means any person determined by the district attorney, the juvenile  department or
the court to have suffered direct financial, psychological or physical  harm as a result of the act that
has brought the youth or youth offender before the juvenile court. When the victim is a  minor,
“victim” includes the  legal guardian of the minor. The youth or youth offender may not be consid-
ered the victim. When the victim of the crime cannot be determined, the people  of Oregon, as re-
presented by the district attorney, are considered the victims.
(35) “Violent felony” means any offense that, if committed  by an adult, would constitute a felony
and:
(a) Involves actual or threatened serious physical injury to a victim; or
(b) Is a sexual offense. As used in this  paragraph, “sexual offense” has the meaning given the
term “sex crime” in ORS 163A.005.
(36) “Ward” means a person within the jurisdiction of the juvenile court under ORS 419B.100.
(37) “Young person” means a person who has been  found responsible except for insanity under
ORS 419C.411 and placed under the jurisdiction of the Psychiatric Security Review Board.
(38) “Youth” means a  person under 18 years of age who is alleged to have committed an act that
is a violation, or, if done by an adult would constitute a violation, of a law or ordinance  of the
United States or a state, county or city.
(39) “Youth care center” has the meaning given that term in ORS 420.855.
(40) “Youth offender” means a person who has  been found to be within the jurisdiction of the
juvenile court under ORS 419C.005 for  an act committed when the person was under 18 years of age.
SECTION 9.
 ORS 419B.112 is amended to read:
419B.112. (1) In every case  under ORS chapter 419B, the court shall appoint a court appointed
special advocate. The court appointed special  advocate is deemed a party in these proceedings and
may be represented by counsel, file pleadings and request hearings  and may subpoena, examine and
cross-examine witnesses. If the court appointed special  advocate is represented by counsel, counsel
shall be paid from funds in the Court Appointed Special  Advocate Fund established under [ ORS
458.584] section 5 of this 2017 Act . Counsel representing a court appointed  special advocate may
not be paid from moneys in the Public Defense Services Account established by  ORS 151.225, from
moneys appropriated to the Public Defense Services Commission or from  Judicial Department oper-
ating funds.
(2) Subject to the direction of  the court, the duties of the court appointed special advocate are
to:
(a) Investigate all relevant information about the case;
(b) Advocate for the child or ward, ensuring that all relevant  facts are brought before the court;
Enrolled House Bill 2600 (HB 2600-A) Page 11
(c) Facilitate and negotiate to ensure that the  court, the Department of Human Services, if ap-
plicable, and the child or ward’s attorney, if any, fulfill their obligations to the child or ward in a
timely fashion; and
(d) Monitor  all court orders to ensure compliance and to bring to the court’s attention any
change in circumstances that may require a modification of an order of the court.
(3) If a juvenile court does not have a sufficient number of  qualified court appointed special
advocates available to it, the court may,  in fulfillment of the requirements of this section, appoint
a juvenile department employee or other suitable person to represent the child or ward’s  interest
in court pursuant to ORS 419A.012 or 419B.195.
(4) Any  person appointed as a court appointed special advocate in any judicial proceeding on
behalf of the child or ward is immune from any liability for defamation or statements made  in good
faith by that person, orally or in writing, in the course of the case review or judicial proceeding.
(5) Any person appointed  as a court appointed special advocate, CASA Volunteer Program di-
rector, CASA Volunteer Program employee or member of the board of directors or trustees of  any
CASA Volunteer Program is immune from any  liability for acts or omissions or errors in judgment
made in good faith in the course or scope of that person’s duties or employment as  part of a CASA
Volunteer  Program.
(6) Whenever the court  appoints a court appointed special advocate or other person under sub-
sections (1) to (3) of this section to represent the  child or ward, the court may require a parent, if
able, or guardian of the estate, if the estate is able, to pay, in whole or in  part, the reasonable costs
of court appointed special  advocate services, including reasonable attorney fees. The court’s order
of payment is enforceable in the same manner as an order of support under ORS 419B.408.
(7) Upon presentation of the order of appointment by the court appointed special advocate,  any
agency,  hospital,  school organization, division, office or department of the state, doctor, nurse or
other health  care provider, psychologist, psychiatrist, police department or mental health clinic shall
permit the court appointed special advocate  to inspect and copy, and may consult with the court
appointed special advocate regarding, any records relating  to the child or ward involved in the case,
without the consent of the child, ward or parents.
(8) All records and information acquired or reviewed  by a court appointed special advocate
during the course of official duties are deemed confidential under ORS 419A.255.
(9) For the purposes of a Child Abuse Prevention  and Treatment Act (42 U.S.C. 5101 et seq.)
grant to this state under P.L. 93-247, or any related state  or federal legislation, a court appointed
special advocate or other  person appointed pursuant to subsections (1) to (3) of this section is
deemed a guardian ad litem to represent the interests of the child or  ward in proceedings before the
court.
SECTION 10.
 ORS 458.558 is amended to read:
458.558. (1) The members of the Oregon Volunteers Commission for  Voluntary Action and Ser-
vice must be citizens of this state who have a proven commitment to  community service and who
have a demonstrated interest in fostering and nurturing citizen involvement as a strategy for
strengthening communities and promoting the ethic of service in all sectors of this state.
(2) The  Governor shall appoint as members of the commission at least one of each of the fol-
lowing:
(a) An individual with experience in educational, training and development needs of youth, par-
ticularly disadvantaged youth.
(b) An individual with experience in promoting involvement  of older adults in service and
volunteerism.
(c) A representative of community-based agencies or organizations within this state.
(d) The Deputy Superintendent of Public Instruction or designee.
(e) A representative of local governments in this state.
(f) A representative of local labor unions in this state.
(g) A representative of business.
Enrolled House Bill 2600 (HB 2600-A) Page 12
(h) A person at least 16, but not more  than 25, years of age who is a participant or supervisor
in a national service program.
(i) A representative of a national service program described in 42 U.S.C. 12572(a).
(3) In addition to appointing members under subsection (2) of this section,  the Governor may
appoint as members individuals from the following groups:
(a) Educators.
(b) Experts in the delivery of human, educational, environmental  or public safety services to
communities and individuals.
(c) Members of Native American tribes.
(d) At-risk youths who are out of school.
(e) Entities that receive assistance under the Domestic Volunteer Service Act of 1973 (42 U.S.C.
4950 et seq.).
[(f) A director or representative of a CASA Volunteer Program. ]
[(g) A court appointed special advocate. ]
(4) In making appointments of members described in subsections (2) and (3) of this  section, the
Governor shall ensure that:
(a) No more than 50 percent of the appointed members are from the same political party; and
(b) No more than 25 percent of the appointed members are state employees.
SECTION 11.
 ORS 458.568 is amended to read:
458.568. The Oregon Volunteers Commission for Voluntary Action and Service shall:
(1) Develop programs and  provide oversight and administration of programs granted to this state
by the Corporation for National and Community Service under the National and Community Service
Trust Act of 1993, as amended, (P.L. 103-82).
(2) Prepare state applications to the Corporation for  National and Community Service for fi-
nancial assistance for state-based service programs.
(3) Develop a statewide plan that is designed to meet or exceed the Oregon  benchmark on
volunteerism.
(4) Develop projects, training methods, curriculum materials and other materials and  activities
related to state service programs that  receive assistance directly from the Corporation for National
and Community Service.
(5) To engage citizens in service and to strengthen communities, create  statewide access for all
Oregon citizens to a variety of volunteer opportunities by:
(a) Evaluating the status of volunteerism in the public, private and nonprofit  sectors of this
state;
(b) Examining methods to strengthen the  capacity of volunteer organizations to support citizen
involvement;  and
(c) Educating all citizens about the importance of citizen involvement and voluntary action.
(6) Encourage youth and young adults to engage in their communities  through voluntary action
by:
(a) Assisting  efforts to inform young Oregonians about opportunities for involvement in the
public, private and nonprofit sectors;
(b) Promoting the value  of service learning as an educational strategy in the kindergarten
through higher educational systems; and
(c) Collaborating with groups to advocate for youth voice in the public, private and  nonprofit
governing  structures.
(7) Promote recognition of volunteerism and  service into the daily operation of public, private
and nonprofit sectors throughout the state by:
(a) Promoting a statewide volunteer recognition plan open to all sectors; and
(b) Assisting efforts by Oregon communities to encourage citizen involvement in volunteerism.
[(8) Implement the provisions of ORS 419B.112 and 458.581. ]
[(9)] (8)  Biennially submit a report to the Governor and the Legislative Assembly as  provided
under ORS 192.230 to 192.245:
Enrolled House Bill 2600 (HB 2600-A) Page 13
(a) Detailing commission activities during the preceding two-year period;
(b) Reviewing and summarizing, to the extent  the commission deems relevant, the content of
reports accepted by the commission on behalf of the Governor;
(c) Assessing the state of volunteerism in Oregon; and
(d) Containing specific recommendations for any additional legislation  the commission deems
necessary to carry out the purpose of the Oregon Volunteer and Community Service Act or  to im-
prove the effectiveness or efficiency of the commission.
TRANSFER OF AUTHORITY FROM
OREGON VOLUNTEERS COMMISSION
FOR VOLUNTARY ACTION AND SERVICE
TO OREGON DEPARTMENT OF ADMINISTRATIVE SERVICES
SECTION 12.
All the duties, functions and powers of the  Oregon Volunteers Commission
for Voluntary Action and Service  relating to the creation, supervision and operation of CASA
Volunteer Programs under ORS 458.581 as that statute  was in effect before the effective date
of this 2017 Act, are imposed upon, transferred to and vested in the  Oregon Department of
Administrative Services.
RECORDS AND PROPERTY
SECTION 13. The director of the Oregon Volunteers Commission  for Voluntary Action
and Service shall deliver to the Director of the Oregon Department of  Administrative Ser-
vices all records and property within the jurisdiction of  the director of the Oregon Volun-
teers Commission for  Voluntary Action and Service that relate to the duties, functions and
powers transferred by section 12 of this 2017 Act, and the Director of the Oregon Department
of Administrative Services shall take possession of  the records and property transferred
under this section.
UNEXPENDED REVENUES
SECTION 14.
(1) The unexpended balances of amounts authorized to be expended by the
Oregon Volunteers Commission for Voluntary Action and Service for  the biennium beginning
July 1, 2017, from  revenues dedicated, continuously appropriated, appropriated or otherwise
made available for the purpose of administering and enforcing the duties, functions  and
powers transferred by section 12 of this  2017 Act are transferred to and are available for
expenditure by the Oregon Department of Administrative  Services for the biennium begin-
ning July 1, 2017, for the  purpose of administering and enforcing the duties, functions and
powers transferred by section 12 of this 2017 Act and under section 3 of this 2017 Act.
(2) Any balance in the  Court Appointed Special Advocate Fund established under ORS
458.584 as that statute was in effect before the effective date of this 2017 Act  that exists in
the fund on the effective date of this 2017 Act is transferred to the  Court Appointed Special
Advocate Fund established under section 5 of this 2017 Act.
(3) The expenditure classifications, if any, established by Acts authorizing or  limiting
expenditures by the Oregon Volunteers Commission for Voluntary Action and Service remain
applicable to expenditures by the Oregon Department of Administrative Services under this
section.
ACTIONS, PROCEEDINGS, PROSECUTIONS
SECTION 15.
The transfer of  duties, functions and powers to the Oregon Department of
Administrative Services by section 12 of this 2017 Act does not affect  any action, proceeding
Enrolled House Bill 2600 (HB 2600-A) Page 14
or prosecution involving or with respect to such duties,  functions and powers begun before
and pending at the time of the  transfer, except that the Oregon Department of Administra-
tive Services is substituted  for the Oregon Volunteers Commission for Voluntary Action and
Service in the action, proceeding or prosecution.
LIABILITIES, DUTIES, OBLIGATIONS
SECTION 16. (1) Nothing in sections 12 to 18 of this 2017 Act relieves a person of a li-
ability, duty or obligation accruing under or with respect to the duties, functions and  powers
transferred by section  12 of this 2017 Act. The Oregon Department of Administrative Ser-
vices may undertake the collection or enforcement of any such liability, duty or obligation.
(2) The rights and obligations of the Oregon Volunteers Commission for Voluntary Action
and Service legally  incurred under contracts, leases and business transactions executed, en-
tered into or begun before the effective date of this 2017  Act and accruing under or with
respect to the  duties, functions and powers transferred by section 12 of this 2017 Act are
transferred to the Oregon Department of Administrative Services. For the purpose of  suc-
cession to these rights  and obligations, the Oregon Department of Administrative Services
is a continuation of the Oregon Volunteers  Commission for Voluntary Action and Service
and not a new authority.
RULES
SECTION 17. Notwithstanding the transfer of duties, functions and powers by section 12
of this 2017 Act, the  rules of the Oregon Volunteers Commission for Voluntary Action and
Service with respect to such duties, functions or powers that are  in effect on the effective
date of this 2017 Act continue in effect until superseded or repealed by rules of the  Oregon
Department of Administrative Services. References in such  rules of the Oregon Volunteers
Commission for Voluntary Action and Service to  the Oregon Volunteers Commission for
Voluntary Action and Service or  an officer or employee of the Oregon Volunteers Commis-
sion for Voluntary Action and  Service are considered to be references to the Oregon De-
partment of Administrative Services or an officer  or employee of the Oregon Department
of Administrative Services.
SECTION 18. Whenever, in any uncodified  law or resolution of the Legislative Assembly
or in any rule, document, record or proceeding authorized  by the Legislative Assembly, in
the context of the duties, functions and powers transferred by  section 12 of this 2017 Act,
reference is  made to the Oregon Volunteers Commission for Voluntary Action and Service
or an officer or employee of  the Oregon Volunteers Commission for Voluntary Action and
Service whose duties, functions or powers are transferred by section 12  of this 2017 Act, the
reference is considered to be  a reference to the Oregon Department of Administrative Ser-
vices or an officer or  employee of the Oregon Department of Administrative Services who
by this 2017 Act is charged with carrying out such duties, functions and powers.
FINANCIAL PROVISIONS
SECTION 18a. (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of  law, the General Fund appro-
priation made to the Housing and Community  Services Department by section 1, chapter
_____, Oregon Laws 2017 (Enrolled House Bill 5012), for  the biennium beginning July 1, 2017,
is decreased by $2,501,299 for the  purpose of the transfer of duties, functions and powers to
the Oregon Department of Administrative Services by section 12 of this 2017 Act.
(2) Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on expenditures
established by section 2, chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2017  (Enrolled House Bill 5012), for the
biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses for oper-
Enrolled House Bill 2600 (HB 2600-A) Page 15
ations, from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and  federal
funds from the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development for contract
services, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds  not described in this section, collected
or received by the Housing and Community Services Department, is decreased by $2,231,252.
SECTION 18b.
(1) In addition to  and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is ap-
propriated to the Oregon Department of Administrative Services, for the  biennium beginning
July 1, 2017, out of the General Fund, the amount of $2,501,299, which may be  expended for
the purpose of administering and enforcing the duties, functions and powers transferred by
section 12 of this 2017 Act.
(2) Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount  of $2,231,252 is es-
tablished for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limit  for payment of ex-
penses from  fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding
lottery funds and federal funds, collected or  received by the Oregon Department of Admin-
istrative Services for special payments for CASA Volunteer Programs.
CAPTIONS
SECTION 19. The unit captions used in this 2017 Act are provided  only for the conven-
ience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of  this state or express any
legislative intent in the enactment of this 2017 Act.
EMERGENCY CLAUSE
SECTION 20. This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation  of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2017 Act takes effect
on July 1, 2017.
Passed by House July 5, 2017
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate July 7, 2017
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Dennis Richardson, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2600 (HB 2600-A) Page 16